Hawaii statutes.
[§421C-27] Bonding. Any individual
acting as manager of an association and handling funds or securities amounting
to $5,000 or more, in any one year, shall be covered by an adequate bond as
determined by the directors and at the expense of the association. The bylaws
may also provide for the bonding of other employees or officers. [L 1982, c 97,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next